lang_data/mni-fonipa/morph_mni-fonipa.lexd
PATTERNS
prefix enclitic suffix
prefix enclitic prefix enclitic
prefix stem enclitic suffix*
stem suffix* stem enclitic*
stem suffix enclitic suffix enclitic
prefix stem enclitic* stem
stem* prefix stem enclitic suffix
stem enclitic suffix enclitic
prefix stem* enclitic
prefix suffix*
stem prefix stem enclitic
stem suffix* enclitic stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix enclitic* suffix
prefix stem suffix
stem* suffix stem
stem suffix
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic suffix
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix enclitic
stem enclitic stem suffix* enclitic
stem suffix* stem suffix stem suffix stem* suffix enclitic
stem* suffix*
prefix stem prefix stem* suffix enclitic
stem suffix* enclitic* suffix
prefix stem suffix* enclitic
stem* enclitic
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix enclitic*
stem suffix enclitic suffix enclitic*
stem* suffix* enclitic suffix
stem* suffix enclitic*
stem enclitic stem
stem suffix* stem suffix*
stem* enclitic*
stem suffix* enclitic suffix infix
stem enclitic suffix enclitic*
stem enclitic prefix stem suffix
stem suffix enclitic stem enclitic
stem* enclitic stem
stem suffix* enclitic suffix
prefix suffix
stem* suffix stem* suffix
stem suffix*
stem* suffix* enclitic
stem enclitic suffix* enclitic
prefix stem* suffix* enclitic
stem suffix enclitic
stem* enclitic* suffix*
stem* prefix stem enclitic*
stem suffix* enclitic
stem suffix* prefix stem enclitic
stem suffix* stem
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic
stem enclitic
stem suffix stem suffix* enclitic
prefix stem enclitic prefix stem enclitic
prefix stem enclitic infix
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic
prefix enclitic* suffix*
stem enclitic suffix
stem* suffix stem enclitic suffix
stem suffix* enclitic*
prefix stem suffix enclitic* suffix
stem suffix prefix stem
prefix stem suffix*
stem prefix stem enclitic suffix enclitic
stem* suffix enclitic
prefix stem* suffix enclitic*
prefix stem
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix
stem enclitic suffix*
prefix stem prefix stem suffix enclitic
stem enclitic*
stem suffix enclitic*
prefix stem enclitic
stem enclitic stem suffix*
prefix stem prefix stem
prefix stem enclitic suffix enclitic
stem suffix* enclitic suffix*
stem suffix prefix stem suffix
stem suffix stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix stem* enclitic
stem enclitic* suffix
enclitic
stem suffix enclitic* infix
stem suffix enclitic suffix
stem suffix stem enclitic
stem suffix stem suffix
stem* suffix* stem suffix
stem prefix stem suffix
stem suffix stem suffix* enclitic*
stem enclitic stem suffix* enclitic*
stem suffix stem suffix*
stem suffix* enclitic stem suffix
prefix enclitic* suffix
prefix stem suffix enclitic suffix
prefix stem* enclitic*
stem* suffix stem enclitic
stem* suffix enclitic stem
prefix stem* enclitic suffix enclitic
stem* suffix stem suffix
prefix stem enclitic prefix stem
stem suffix enclitic stem
stem* enclitic suffix
prefix stem prefix stem suffix enclitic*
phrase
stem suffix* enclitic stem suffix*
stem enclitic stem suffix
prefix stem suffix enclitic
prefix enclitic prefix stem
stem
stem suffix stem enclitic*
prefix stem suffix enclitic*
stem* suffix stem suffix enclitic
prefix enclitic*
stem* suffix stem suffix* enclitic
stem* suffix stem suffix enclitic*
enclitic*
prefix enclitic stem enclitic
stem suffix stem suffix enclitic*
suffix*
prefix stem* suffix*
stem suffix enclitic suffix*
stem enclitic stem enclitic
stem* suffix
stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix
stem* enclitic stem* enclitic
stem*
stem enclitic stem* suffix*
prefix stem enclitic suffix
prefix enclitic
stem* suffix* enclitic*
prefix stem suffix stem enclitic
stem enclitic suffix stem
stem suffix stem
stem suffix stem* suffix*
prefix stem* suffix
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic suffix
stem suffix* enclitic stem
stem prefix stem* enclitic suffix*
prefix stem suffix stem suffix
stem suffix stem*
stem* suffix enclitic suffix enclitic*
enclitic* suffix
prefix stem enclitic*
stem suffix* enclitic suffix enclitic
stem suffix* stem suffix
prefix stem* suffix enclitic
suffix
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic*
stem* suffix enclitic suffix
prefix stem prefix stem suffix
stem prefix stem
stem* enclitic* suffix
prefix stem*
stem* suffix stem suffix*
stem suffix* stem enclitic
prefix stem suffix* enclitic*
stem* prefix stem
prefix stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix enclitic*
prefix
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic*
